New Jersey, session 222, A3293.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.40A:16-6 is amended to read as follows: N.J.S.40A:16-6.  An appointment to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor shall be by a majority vote of the entire membership of the governing body.  Those members who abstain from a vote pursuant to this section shall not be counted toward the remaining members of the governing body, and a majority shall be determined by those voting in favor or in opposition to a nominee to fill the vacancy. (cf: N.J.S.40A:16-6) 2.  N.J.S.40A:16-7 is amended to read as follows: N.J.S.40A:16-7.  An appointment to fill a vacancy in the membership of a governing body shall be by a majority vote of the remaining members of the governing body.  Those members who abstain from a vote pursuant to this section shall not be counted toward the remaining members of the governing body, and a majority shall be determined by those voting in favor or in opposition to a nominee to fill the vacancy. (cf: N.J.S.40A:16-7) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under the provisions of this bill a member of a municipal governing body who abstains from voting to fill a vacancy in the office of mayor or on the governing body would not be counted as a remaining member of the governing body, and a majority would be determined by those voting in favor or in opposition to a nominee to fill the vacancy.